Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Retirement System for Judges and Commissioners
21.420.
Death benefits for members — Designation of beneficiary to receive accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance.

After the death of a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who at the time of his death was receiving a service retirement allowance (other than an actuarially reduced allowance under subsection (3) of KRS

21.400

), or was receiving a disability retirement allowance, his surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of that he was receiving.

If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies before retirement and before reaching normal retirement age, without regard to length of service, his surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly allowance the member would have received commencing at his normal retirement date if he had continued in service until that date and had then retired, computed however on the basis of his final compensation at time of death.

If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies before retirement and after reaching normal retirement age, his surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly allowance the member would have been entitled to, on the basis of his years of service, had he retired on the date of his death.

If a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, dies after retirement and was at the time of his death receiving an actuarially reduced allowance under subsection (3) of KRS

21.400

, or was not at the time of his death receiving a retirement allowance but had acquired the vested right under subsection (2) of KRS

21.400

to have received an allowance upon reaching normal retirement age, his surviving spouse is entitled to receive during his lifetime a monthly allowance equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly allowance the member would have received when he reached normal retirement age.

A member, or a retiree who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, who has not commenced drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS

21.400

, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children entitled to survivor’s benefits, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the accumulated contributions of the member. A member, or a retiree who began participating in the plan on or after January 1, 2014, who has not commenced drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS

21.402

, who dies without a spouse or eligible children entitled to survivor’s benefits, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the accumulated account balance of the member. Absent a designation by the member or retiree, the accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance, as applicable based upon the member’s participation date, shall be paid to the member’s estate.

A member who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, who commences drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS

21.400

or

21.410

, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children entitled to survivor’s benefits and before the benefits received by the member equal the accumulated contributions of the member, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated contributions of the member. A member who began participating in the plan on or after January 1, 2014, who commences drawing retirement benefits pursuant to KRS

21.402

or

21.410

, and who dies without a spouse or eligible children entitled to survivor’s benefits and before the benefits received by the member equal the accumulated account balance of the member, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated account balance of the member. Any benefits received shall be deducted from the accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance. Absent a designation by the member, the balance of the accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance, as applicable based upon the member’s participation date, shall be paid to the member’s estate.

A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may designate a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of the accumulated contributions of the member, in the event survivor’s benefits are being paid pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, and the survivor dies prior to receiving benefits equal to the member’s contributions. In this event, the provisions of subsection (5) of this section shall apply as to offset and payment.

A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may, prior to the drawing of benefits, elect in writing to the executive secretary of the Judicial Form Retirement System, to take an optional retirement allowance which shall be actuarially equivalent to the amount of retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member and the member’s spouse. If the member dies after retirement, the option chosen shall prevail over the provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of this section. If the member dies prior to retirement, the option chosen shall prevail over the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. The options shall include:

Survivorship one hundred percent (100%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during the member’s lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.

Survivorship sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during the member’s lifetime and have two-thirds (2/3) of the retirement allowance continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.

If a retiree, living or deceased, chose either of the optional retirement benefit allowances specified in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subsection from July 15, 1994, to July 15, 1998, the optional allowance shall be adjusted accordingly, and the new benefit shall commence August 1, 1998. Each recipient of benefits from the plan, who retired from July 15, 1994, to July 15, 1998, shall have a one-time opportunity to select an optional retirement allowance. The election by the recipient shall be prior to August 1, 1998, at which time the new benefit shall commence. The option chosen shall prevail, subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section notwithstanding.

For a member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014:

If the member dies prior to drawing a retirement allowance, then the surviving spouse may elect to:

Take a refund of the member’s accumulated account balance or accumulated contributions as provided by KRS

21.402

; or

If the member had at least five (5) years of service in the plan at the time of his or her death, have the member’s accumulated account balance annuitized into a monthly benefit payable for life that is equal to the benefit that would have been paid had the member retired immediately prior to his or her date of death and elected to receive benefits payable under the survivorship one hundred percent (100%) option as provided by paragraph (b)1. of this subsection.

In lieu of the benefits provided by this paragraph to the surviving spouse, the member may elect to have the benefits payable under this paragraph paid to an individual dependent child by completing the forms provided prescribed by the Judicial Form Retirement System. If no surviving spouse or dependent children are eligible to receive benefits, then the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply to the member.

If a member dies on or after the date the member begins drawing a retirement allowance, the benefits payable to the surviving spouse shall be based upon whether or not the member elects prior to retirement to receive an optional retirement allowance. The election shall be in writing on the forms prescribed by the Judicial Form Retirement System and shall be actuarially equivalent to the amount of retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member. The optional retirement allowances shall include:

Survivorship one hundred percent (100%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during the member’s lifetime and have the retirement allowance continued after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse;

Survivorship sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during the member’s lifetime and have two-thirds (2/3) of the retirement allowance continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse; or

Survivorship fifty percent (50%). The member may elect to receive a decreased retirement allowance during the member’s lifetime and have one-half (1/2) of the retirement allowance continue after death to the spouse during the lifetime of the spouse.

In lieu of the benefits provided by this paragraph to the surviving spouse, the member may elect prior to retirement to have the benefits payable under this paragraph paid to an individual dependent child by completing the forms provided by the Judicial Form Retirement System. If no surviving spouse or dependent children are eligible to receive benefits, then the provisions of subsection (5) of this section shall apply to the member.

For purposes of this section a “dependent child” shall mean a child who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age or a disabled child who is eligible for Social Security disability benefits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 8; 1974, ch. 386, § 3; 1994, ch. 266, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 120, § 27, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

21.425.
Benefits to surviving or disabled children of members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Designation of beneficiaries.

In any circumstances in which a surviving spouse would be entitled to any allowance under KRS

21.420

, but there is no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse subsequently dies, and there is a surviving child or children of the member under the age of twenty-one (21), or there is a disabled child or children, the monthly allowance that the surviving spouse would have received or was receiving shall be continued, as follows:

If the member does not have a disabled child or children, the benefit shall continue until there are no children remaining under the age of twenty-one (21); or

If the member has a disabled child or children, the benefit shall continue until the death of the last remaining disabled child.

A member may designate his child or children under the age of twenty-one (21), or his disabled child or children, to receive the death benefit payable under KRS

21.420

instead of his spouse, or he may designate that his spouse shall receive a percentage of the death benefit, and his child or children under the age of twenty-one (21), or his disabled child or children, shall receive the remainder. The member making such a choice shall designate his beneficiary or beneficiaries in writing to the manager of the Judicial Form Retirement System on a form provided by the manager.

For purposes of this section, “disabled” means an individual determined by the Social Security Administration to be entitled to total disability benefits.

Subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall not apply to a member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 306, § 1; 1974, ch. 232, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 4; 1982, ch. 458, § 10, effective April 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 389, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 327, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2013, ch. 120, § 28, effective July 1, 2013.

21.427.
Health insurance and benefits for recipients — Premium reimbursement plan — Coordination with all state-administered retirement systems or plans.

The board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall arrange by appropriate contract or on a self-insured basis for a group hospital and medical insurance plan for recipients of a retirement allowance from the Judicial Retirement Plan, and their dependents. For recipients, or dependents, eligible for Medicare coverage, the board shall provide Medicare supplement hospital and medical insurance coverage. For recipients, or dependents, not eligible for Medicare coverage, the board shall provide hospital and medical insurance coverage comparable to that provided under the major state employees’ group insurance, and the board may arrange for the recipients to be included in the major state employees group. For recipients of a retirement allowance who are not eligible for the same level of hospital and medical benefits as recipients living in Kentucky, the board shall provide a medical insurance premium reimbursement plan as described in subsection (3) of this section.

For the purpose of this section, the “dependent” of a recipient means the spouse or minor children, or both, of a recipient who is a living former member of the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the minor children of a deceased former member whose surviving spouse is the recipient.

Depending upon the number of months of service credit upon which the retirement allowance was based, and upon there having been at least forty-eight (48) months of judicial service, all or a portion of the premium required to provide hospital and medical benefits under this section shall be paid from the judicial retirement fund, as follows:

For members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014:

Participation in the health insurance coverage and benefits provided under this section shall not be allowed until the member has earned at least one hundred eighty (180) months of service credited under KRS

21.345

to

21.580

or another state-administered retirement system.

A member who meets the minimum service requirements as provided by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be eligible for a monthly insurance benefit upon retirement of ten dollars ($10) for each year of service as a participating member of the Judicial Retirement Plan.

The minimum service required to participate in benefits as provided by subparagraph 1. of this subparagraph shall be waived for a member who is disabled in the line of duty as defined in KRS

61.621

, and the member shall be entitled to the health benefits payable under this subsection as though the member has twenty (20) years of service in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

The minimum service required to participate in benefits as provided by subparagraph 1. of this subparagraph shall be waived for a member who is killed in the line of duty as described in KRS

61.621

, and the member’s spouse and eligible dependents shall be entitled to the health benefits the member would have received if he or she had retired with twenty (20) years of service in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

The monthly insurance benefit amount provided by this paragraph shall be increased July 1 of each year by one and one-half percent (1.5%). The increase shall be cumulative and shall continue to accrue after the member’s retirement for as long as a monthly insurance benefit is payable to the retired member.

Under no circumstances shall the cost of coverage be paid for the spouse, dependents, or beneficiaries of a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, except as provided by subparagraph 4. of this paragraph.

The health insurance payments provided by this subsection shall be made by the fund only if the recipient agrees to pay the remaining, if any, amount of the premium by deduction from his retirement allowance or by another method equally insuring the payment by him.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any member with the minimum number of months of judicial service required by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection who is also eligible for benefits, or who is receiving benefits from any retirement plan or system administered by the Commonwealth shall be entitled to hospital and medical benefits as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection except that the number of months of service credit used in calculating the level of benefits shall be the sum of service credited to the member in all the state-administered retirement systems or plans.

Upon request of the member, the Judicial Retirement System shall compute the member’s combined service in all the state-administered retirement systems or plans and calculate the portion of the member’s premium to be paid by the Judicial Retirement Plan, according to the criteria established in paragraph (a) of this subsection. For members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, the state-administered retirement systems or plans shall pay to the Judicial Retirement Plan the applicable percentage of the plan’s cost of the retiree’s hospital and medical premium which shall be equal to the percentage of the member’s number of months of service in the applicable state-administered retirement systems or plans divided by his total combined service. The amounts paid by all the state-administered retirement systems or plans shall not be more than one hundred percent (100%) of the premium amount adopted by the respective boards of trustees.

A member who elects hospital and medical benefits under this subsection shall lose any claim to insurance benefits under any of the other state-administered retirement systems or plans.

This paragraph shall not apply to members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

The board shall establish a medical insurance premium reimbursement plan for recipients of a retirement allowance who are not eligible for the same level of hospital and medical benefits as recipients living in Kentucky having the same Medicare hospital and medical insurance eligibility status. An eligible recipient shall file proof of payment for hospital and medical insurance premiums at the retirement office. Reimbursement to eligible recipients shall be made on a quarterly basis. The recipient shall be eligible for reimbursement of substantiated medical insurance premiums for an amount not to exceed the total monthly contribution determined by the board of trustees. The plan shall not be made available if all recipients are eligible for the same level of coverage as recipients living in Kentucky.

Premiums paid for hospital and medical insurance procured under this section shall be exempt from any premium tax which might otherwise be required under KRS Chapter 136. The payment of premiums by the judicial retirement fund shall not constitute income to the recipient. No commission shall be paid for hospital and medical insurance procured under this section.

Months of Judicial Service Percentage of Premium 240 or more 100% 180 to 239, inclusive 75% 120 to 179, inclusive 50% 48 to 119, inclusive 25%

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 299, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 167, § 30, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 389, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 448, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 120, § 29, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 9, effective July 15, 2016.

21.430.
Judicial retirement board. [Repealed.]

21.440.
Duties of investment committee — Duties of board — Actuarial valuations, investigations, and analyses — Audit.

The investment committee for the judicial retirement fund shall at least once in every two (2) year period procure an actuarial valuation of the judicial retirement fund. The valuation shall, at a minimum, include:

A description of the actuarial assumptions used in the actuarial valuation, which shall be reasonably related to the experience of the fund and represent the actuary’s best estimate of anticipated experience;

A description of any funding methods utilized or required by state law in the development of the actuarial valuation results;

A description of any changes in actuarial assumptions and methods from the previous year’s actuarial valuation;

The actuarially recommended contribution rate for employers for the upcoming budget periods;

A thirty (30) year projection of the funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers based upon the actuarial assumptions, funding methods, and experience of the system as of the valuation date;

A sensitivity analysis that evaluates the impact of changes in plan assumptions, including but not limited to the investment return assumption, payroll growth assumption, and medical inflation assumptions, on employer contribution rates, funding levels, and unfunded liabilities; and

An actuarial investigation to be made of all of the economic experience under the plans, including but not limited to the inflation rate and investment return assumptions, relative to the economic assumptions and funding methods previously adopted by the board. The actuarial investigation shall include at a minimum a summary of the changes in actuarial assumptions and funding methods recommended in the investigation and the projected impact of the recommended changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.

At least once in each five (5) year period, the board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall cause an actuarial investigation to be made of all the relevant demographic experience under the retirement plan, including but not limited to mortality tables, withdrawal rates, and retirement rate assumptions, relative to the demographic actuarial assumptions previously adopted by the board. The actuarial investigation shall include at a minimum a summary of the changes in actuarial assumptions recommended in the investigation and the projected impact of the recommended changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.

Pursuant to the investigation, the board shall from time to time revise the actuarial tables previously adopted by the board and shall thereupon revise the bases of the rates of contributions required under KRS

21.345

to

21.580

.

For any change in actuarial assumptions, funding methods, retiree health insurance premiums and subsidies, or any other decisions made by the board that impact system liabilities and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers and that are not made in conjunction with the actuarial investigations required by paragraphs (a)7. and (b) of this subsection, an actuarial analysis shall be completed showing the projected impact of the changes on funding levels, unfunded liabilities, and actuarially recommended contribution rates for employers over a thirty (30) year period.

A copy of the valuation, each actuarial investigation, and any analysis required by this subsection shall be forwarded electronically to the Legislative Research Commission within ten (10) days of receipt by the committee, and the Legislative Research Commission shall distribute the information received to the committee staff and co-chairs of any committee that has jurisdiction over the Judicial Form Retirement System. The actuarial valuation required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be submitted no later than November 15 following the close of the fiscal year.

All the investigations and valuations shall be certified to the board by an actuary who shall be a fellow of the Conference of Consulting Actuaries or a member of the American Academy of Actuaries.

The board of trustees of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall annually procure an audit of the system and each of the funds therein. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the board may select an independent certified public accountant or the Auditor of Public Accounts to perform the audit. If the audit is performed by an independent certified public accountant, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall not be required to perform an audit pursuant to KRS 43.050(2)(a), but may perform an audit at his discretion. The board shall make copies of the audit required by this section available for examination by any member or beneficiary in the office of the manager of the system and in such other places as may be necessary to make the audit available to all members and beneficiaries. A copy of the audit shall be sent to the Legislative Research Commission within ten (10) days of receipt by the committee.

Once every five (5) years, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall perform the audit described by this subsection, and the system shall reimburse the Auditor of Public Accounts for all costs of the audit. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall determine which fiscal year during the five (5) year period the audit prescribed by this paragraph will be completed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 10; 1980, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 27, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 489, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 75, § 4, effective April 11, 2012; 2016 ch. 133, § 4, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 64, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 165, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

21.450.
Funding of benefits — Trustee — Duties of board or investment adviser — Accrual of benefits.

The benefits provided by KRS

21.350

to

21.510

to be paid shall be funded through contract with a reputable life insurance company authorized to do business in this state, or through investment and reinvestment of funds in securities which, at the time of making the investment, are by law permitted for the investment of funds by fiduciaries in this state, or through a combination of such methods. To the extent that funding is provided through insurance contract, no contributions, payments or premiums shall be subject to any tax on insurance premiums or annuity considerations. The investment committee for the judicial retirement fund shall be trustee of any and all funds contributed or appropriated to the retirement system, and shall have sole authority to make insurance contracts or investments.

The board members or any investment adviser shall discharge their duties with respect to the funds of the retirement system solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries and:

For the exclusive purposes of providing benefits to members and their beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the plan;

With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent man acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; and

In accordance with the laws, regulations and other instruments governing the funds.

Any accrual of benefits provided under this or any other applicable statute shall be no less than the benefit adjustment provided for in KRS 21.405(4) from the date of the last establishment of that benefit.

The board shall establish ethics policies and procedures by promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. The ethics policies shall include but not be limited to annual financial and conflict of interest disclosure requirements which must be completed by all board members and made available to the public upon request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 11; 1978, ch. 384, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 246, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 169, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 448, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 75, § 5, effective April 11, 2012.

21.455.
Registration and custody of securities. [Repealed.]

21.460.
Refund of contributions or account balance for members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Purchase of service credit — Interest on deferred refunds — Repayment.

For members who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014: If any member of the plan ceases, other than by death or by disability retirement under KRS

21.410

, to hold an office qualifying him or her for membership in the plan established by KRS

21.350

to

21.480

, without having met the requirements for vesting, he or she shall be refunded on demand the amount of his or her accumulated contributions and any service credit he or she had in the plan shall be nullified.

A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, may, if the member ceases to hold an office qualifying him or her for membership in the plan established by KRS

21.345

to

21.580

, elect to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance subject to the limitations provided by KRS

21.402

.

The member may elect to leave his or her contributions in the plan, in which event the service credit he or she had in the plan shall be considered to be service credit for vesting purposes as provided in KRS

21.375

and for service retirement eligibility as provided in KRS 61.680(7), and, in the event he or she again becomes a member of the Judicial Retirement Plan, shall be counted toward his or her total service credit in that plan.

If a person who has been refunded his or her accumulated contributions or accumulated account balance in accordance with subsection (1) of this section subsequently becomes a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or Teachers’ Retirement System, he or she may while holding such membership repurchase the service credit he or she previously had in the Judicial Retirement Plan by repaying to that plan the amount that was refunded to him or her with interest at six percent (6%) per annum, in which event such service credit shall have operative effect to the same limited extent as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Service purchased under this subsection on or after January 1, 2014, shall not be used to determine the member’s participation date in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

If a person who has been refunded his accumulated contribution or accumulated account balance in accordance with subsection (1) of this section thereafter becomes again the holder of an office qualifying him or her for membership in the Judicial Retirement Plan, he or she shall not be entitled to credit for his or her prior period of service unless he or she has previously repaid his or her refunded contributions in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or unless within thirty (30) days after again assuming office he or she repays to the plan the amount that was refunded to him or her with interest at six percent (6%) per annum. Service purchased under this subsection on or after January 1, 2014, shall not be used to determine the member’s participation date in the Judicial Retirement Plan.

If the taking of a refund of contributions by a member of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan, when first entitled thereto, would subject the member to a federal excise tax, by reason of the refund’s being made before the member has reached an age designated by the federal taxing act, and the member has elected, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, to defer taking a refund, so much of the contributions as would have been subject to the excise tax shall accrue interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, from the date the member first could have taken a refund until the date the refund is taken or the date as of which the federal excise tax no longer would apply to a refund, whichever is sooner, the interest to be paid by the plan at the time of the refund. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 12; 1962, ch. 9, § 8; 1968, ch. 152, § 6; 1982, ch. 458, § 2, effective April 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 28, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 299, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2013, ch. 120, § 30, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 10, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 102, § 43, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In the absence of any legal relationship between the Judicial Retirement System and its ex-member the fact that the latter may subsequently obtain service credit in another state retirement system would not entitle him to count that service credit toward vesting in the Judicial Retirement System.

OAG 78-538

.

Since there is no legal obligation on the part of the Judicial Retirement System to an ex-member who does not demand a refund, the contributions then being held by the Judicial Retirement System do not constitute or reflect service credit in that system, and, at best, the contributions simply constitute an amount of money belonging to the ex-member which he has left in the hands of the Judicial Retirement System.

OAG 78-538

.

21.470.
Exemption from taxation, execution — Taxability after December 31, 1997.

All retirement allowances and other benefits accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of KRS

21.350

to

21.510

are hereby exempted from any state, county or municipal tax, and shall not be subject to execution, attachment, garnishment or any other process whatsoever, nor shall any assignment thereof be enforceable in any court. Except retirement benefits accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of KRS

21.350

to

21.510

on or after January 1, 1998, shall be subject to the tax imposed by KRS

141.020

, to the extent provided in KRS

141.010

and

141.0215

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 13; 1995 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3, effective April 28, 1995.

21.480.
KRS 21.350 to 21.510 creates vested interest for members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Exception — Amendment of benefits and rights.

For members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, it is hereby declared that in consideration of the contributions by the members, and in further consideration of benefits received by the state through the inducement of qualified and experienced judges and commissioners to continue in service, KRS

21.350

to

21.510

, except as provided in KRS

6.696

, shall constitute an inviolable contract of the Commonwealth, and the rights and benefits provided therein shall, not be subject to reduction or impairment by alteration, amendment or repeal, except as provided in KRS

6.696

.

For members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, the General Assembly reserves the right to amend, suspend, or reduce the benefits and rights provided under KRS

21.345

to

21.580

if, in its judgment, the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands, except that the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall not be affected.

For purposes of this subsection, the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall be limited to the accumulated account balance the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to change any other benefit or right specified by KRS

21.345

to

21.580

, for members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, except the benefits specified by paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to amend, reduce, or suspend the benefits and rights of members of the Judicial Retirement Plan as provided by KRS

21.345

to

21.580

that the General Assembly had the authority to amend, reduce, or suspend, prior to July 1, 2013.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 14; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 76, effective September 16, 1993; 2013, ch. 120, § 31, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 11, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 10, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In light of the contractual obligation created by this section, the General Assembly may now limit retirement benefits to a certain maximum percentage of final annual salary only prospectively as to present nonretired and future members of the retirement plan.

OAG 78-4

.

The General Assembly could enact legislation guaranteeing members of this retirement system only the amount each has contributed toward his retirement benefits but such legislation may not have retroactive effect.

OAG 78-4

.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) contained
an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the
Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State
on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st
Ex. Sess.), provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89,
and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred
ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other
subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other
specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule
is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for
in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows:
“within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before
April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act”
= on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date
of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the
effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within
150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993;
“within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before
August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date
of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

21.490.
Termination of membership in Kentucky employees’ retirement system — Refund of contributions. [Repealed.]

21.500.
Provision for judge or commissioner who is over seventy on effective date of system. [Repealed.]